Louisiana, session 2026, SB20.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 11:102(B)(1)(a) is hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
§102. Employer contributions; determination; state systems
* * *
B.(1)(a) Except as provided in R.S. 11:102.1, 102.2, 102.3, 102.4, and 102.5
and in Paragraph (5) of this Subsection, for each fiscal year, commencing with Fiscal
Year 1989-1990, for each of the public retirement systems referenced in Subsection
A of this Section, the legislature shall set the required employer contribution rate for
each system or plan equal to the sum of the following:
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 11:102(E)(4), 102.3, and 1145.1 are hereby repealed.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 20 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.